Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 76 O.S. 2021, Section 52.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 52.1. A. No firearm manufacturer, distributor, or


seller who lawfully manufactures, distributes, or sells a firearm is


liable to any person or entity, or to the estate, successors, or


survivors of either, for any injury suffered, including wrongful


death and property damage, because of use of such firearm by


another.


B. If any judgment is made against a firearm manufacturer


located in this state for any liabilities as described in subsection


A of this section, the manufacturer may utilize an amount not to


exceed the amount of withholding of the employees of the

Req. No. 3179 Page 1


manufacturer in the most recent tax year to pay for such liability.


The Oklahoma Tax Commission, upon submission of the judgment, shall


transfer funds from current withholding tax collections into an


agency special account designated for this purpose by the Oklahoma


Tax Commission at such times as may be deemed necessary by the Tax


Commission.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3179 QD 1/15/2026 8:31:21 AM































Req. No. 3179 Page 2